Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
PREAMBLE

We, the people of the State of Wyoming, grateful to God for our civil, political and religious liberties, and desiring to secure them to ourselves and perpetuate them to our posterity, do ordain and establish this Constitution.

Cross references. —

For provision that all schools and colleges must give instruction in United States and Wyoming Constitutions, see §

21-9-102

.

Effective date of constitution. —

The constitution of Wyoming went into effect on July 10, 1890, upon approval of the Act of Admission of Wyoming into the union. State ex rel. Sullivan v. Schnitger, 16 Wyo. 479, 95 P. 698,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1908).

Construction of constitution. —

A constitution should be construed so as to give effect to intent of the people in adopting it and according to the natural and most obvious import of the language. Rasmussen v. Baker, 7 Wyo. 117, 50 P. 819,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1897).

The general principles governing construction of statutes apply to the construction of constitutions, the fundamental purpose being to ascertain the intent of the persons adopting them. Zancanelli v. Central Coal & Coke Co., 25 Wyo. 511, 173 P. 981,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1918).

The constitution should be construed as a whole in order to ascertain the general purposes and meaning of each part. Ross v. Trustees of Univ., 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Constitutionality of a statute

will not be passed on unless the decision is necessary to determination of the pending case. State v. Kelley, 17 Wyo. 335, 98 P. 886,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1909).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Fetal Rights—Why the Abortion “Albatross” Is a Bird of a Different Color: The Case for Fetal-Federalism,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 627 (1993).